searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/hungarian/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/

/*
Hungarian Stemmer
Removes noun inflections
*/

routines (
    mark_regions
    R1
    v_ending
    case
    case_special
    case_other
    plural
    owned
    sing_owner
    plur_owner
    instrum
    factive
    undouble
    double
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( p1 )
groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a'  hex 'E1'  //a-acute
stringdef e'  hex 'E9'  //e-acute
stringdef i'  hex 'ED'  //i-acute
stringdef o'  hex 'F3'  //o-acute
stringdef o"  hex 'F6'  //o-umlaut
stringdef oq  hex 'F5'  //o-double acute
stringdef u'  hex 'FA'  //u-acute
stringdef u"  hex 'FC'  //u-umlaut
stringdef uq  hex 'FB'  //u-double acute

define v 'aeiou{a'}{e'}{i'}{o'}{o"}{oq}{u'}{u"}{uq}'

define mark_regions as (

    $p1 = limit

    (v goto non-v
     among('cs' 'gy' 'ly' 'ny' 'sz' 'ty' 'zs' 'dzs') or next
     setmark p1)
    or

    (non-v gopast v setmark p1)
)

backwardmode (

    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor

    define v_ending as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            '{a'}' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}' (<- 'e')
        )
    )

    define double as (
        test among('bb' 'cc' 'ccs' 'dd' 'ff' 'gg' 'ggy' 'jj' 'kk' 'll' 'lly' 'mm'
        'nn' 'nny' 'pp' 'rr' 'ss' 'ssz' 'tt' 'tty' 'vv' 'zz' 'zzs')
    )

    define undouble as (
        next [hop 1] delete
    )

    define instrum as(
        [substring] R1 among(
            'al' (double)
            'el' (double)
        )
        delete
        undouble
    )


    define case as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            'ban' 'ben'
            'ba' 'be'
            'ra' 're'
            'nak' 'nek'
            'val' 'vel'
            't{o'}l' 't{oq}l'
            'r{o'}l' 'r{oq}l'
            'b{o'}l' 'b{oq}l'
            'hoz' 'hez' 'h{o"}z'
            'n{a'}l' 'n{e'}l'
            'ig'
            'at' 'et' 'ot' '{o"}t'
            '{e'}rt'
            'k{e'}pp' 'k{e'}ppen'
            'kor'
            'ul' '{u"}l'
            'v{a'}' 'v{e'}'
            'onk{e'}nt' 'enk{e'}nt' 'ank{e'}nt'
            'k{e'}nt'
            'en' 'on' 'an' '{o"}n'
            'n'
            't'
        )
        delete
        v_ending
    )

    define case_special as(
        [substring] R1 among(
            '{e'}n' (<- 'e')
            '{a'}n' (<- 'a')
            '{a'}nk{e'}nt' (<- 'a')
        )
    )

    define case_other as(
        [substring] R1 among(
            'astul' 'est{u"}l' (delete)
            'stul' 'st{u"}l' (delete)
            '{a'}stul' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}st{u"}l' (<- 'e')
        )
    )

    define factive as(
        [substring] R1 among(
            '{a'}' (double)
            '{e'}' (double)
        )
        delete
        undouble
    )

    define plural as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            '{a'}k' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}k' (<- 'e')
            '{o"}k' (delete)
            'ak' (delete)
            'ok' (delete)
            'ek' (delete)
            'k' (delete)
        )
    )

    define owned as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'ok{e'}' '{o"}k{e'}' 'ak{e'}' 'ek{e'}' (delete)
            '{e'}k{e'}' (<- 'e')
            '{a'}k{e'}' (<- 'a')
            'k{e'}' (delete)
            '{e'}{e'}i' (<- 'e')
            '{a'}{e'}i' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}i'  (delete)
            '{e'}{e'}' (<- 'e')
            '{e'}' (delete)
        )
    )

    define sing_owner as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            '{u"}nk' 'unk' (delete)
            '{a'}nk' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}nk' (<- 'e')
            'nk' (delete)
            '{a'}juk' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}j{u"}k' (<- 'e')
            'juk' 'j{u"}k' (delete)
            'uk' '{u"}k' (delete)
            'em' 'om' 'am' (delete)
            '{a'}m' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}m' (<- 'e')
            'm' (delete)
            'od' 'ed' 'ad' '{o"}d' (delete)
            '{a'}d' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}d' (<- 'e')
            'd' (delete)
            'ja' 'je' (delete)
            'a' 'e' 'o' (delete)
            '{a'}' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}' (<- 'e')
        )
    )

    define plur_owner as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            'jaim' 'jeim' (delete)
            '{a'}im' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}im' (<- 'e')
            'aim' 'eim' (delete)
            'im' (delete)
            'jaid' 'jeid' (delete)
            '{a'}id' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}id' (<- 'e')
            'aid' 'eid' (delete)
            'id' (delete)
            'jai' 'jei' (delete)
            '{a'}i' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}i' (<- 'e')
            'ai' 'ei' (delete)
            'i' (delete)
            'jaink' 'jeink' (delete)
            'eink' 'aink' (delete)
            '{a'}ink' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}ink' (<- 'e')
            'ink'
            'jaitok' 'jeitek' (delete)
            'aitok' 'eitek' (delete)
            '{a'}itok' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}itek' (<- 'e')
            'itek' (delete)
            'jeik' 'jaik' (delete)
            'aik' 'eik' (delete)
            '{a'}ik' (<- 'a')
            '{e'}ik' (<- 'e')
            'ik' (delete)
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
      do instrum
        do case
        do case_special
        do case_other
        do factive
        do owned
        do sing_owner
        do plur_owner
        do plural
    )
)
